Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.260

Bailiffs—Threat assessments and investigations.

(1) Bailiffs of the supreme court are authorized to conduct threat assessments on behalf of supreme court justices. The supreme court shall ensure that supreme court bailiffs are qualified by training and experience.

(2) Bailiffs of the supreme court are authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data for purposes exclusively related to the investigation of any person making a threat as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 against a supreme court justice. Dissemination or use of criminal history records or nonconviction data for purposes other than authorized in this section is prohibited.

(3) Founded threats investigated under this section must be referred to local law enforcement for further action. Local law enforcement is authorized to report the outcome and any anticipated action to bailiffs of the supreme court.

[ 2024 c 303 s 1.]